test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-syoyoTS_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - сё: # Noun 'throat / (fin) kurkku' - partial paradigm /Type +ÿ+o/ - syo
     сё+N+Sg+Nom: сё
     сё+N+Sg+Acc: сёмʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Gen: сёʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Dat: сёнʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Loc: сёхона
     сё+N+Sg+Abl: сёход
     сё+N+Sg+Pros: сёвна
     сё+N+Du+Nom: сёхоʼ
     сё+N+Du+Acc: сёхоʼ
     сё+N+Du+Gen: сёхоʼ
     сё+N+Pl+Nom: сёˮ
     сё+N+Pl+Acc: [сёё, сёе]
     сё+N+Pl+Gen: [сёёˮ, сёеˮ]
     сё+N+Pl+Dat: сёхоˮ
     сё+N+Pl+Loc: сёхоˮна
     сё+N+Pl+Abl: сёхот
     сё+N+Pl+Pros: [сёёˮмана, сёеˮмана]
     сё+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [сёв, сёми]
     сё+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [сёв, сёми]
     сё+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [сён, сёни]
     сё+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [сёхон, сёхони]
     сё+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [сёхонан, сёхонани]
     сё+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [сёходан, сёходани]
     сё+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [сёвнан, сёвнани]
     сё+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [сёхоюн, сёхоюни]
     сё+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [сёхоюн, сёхоюни]
     сё+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [сёхоюн, сёхоюни]
     сё+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [сёён, сёен, сёёни, сёени]
     сё+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [сёён, сёен, сёёни, сёени]
     сё+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: [сёёˮн, сёеˮн, сёёˮни, сёеˮни]
     сё+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: [сёхоˮн, сёхоˮни]
     сё+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [сёхоˮнан, сёхоˮнани]
     сё+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [сёхотан, сёхотани]
     сё+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: [сёёˮманан, сёеˮманан, сёёˮманани, сёеˮманани]
     сё+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: сёр
     сё+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: сёмд
     сё+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: сёнд
     сё+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: сёхонд
     сё+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: сёхонанд
     сё+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: сёходанд
     сё+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: сёвнанд
     сё+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: сёхоюд
     сё+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: сёхоюд
     сё+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: сёхоют
     сё+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: [сёёд, сёед]
     сё+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: [сёёд, сёед]
     сё+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: [сёёт, сёет]
     сё+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: сёхот
     сё+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: сёхоˮнат
     сё+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: сёхотат
     сё+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: [сёёˮманат, сёеˮманат]
     сё+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: сёда
     сё+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: сёмда
     сё+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: сёнда
     сё+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: сёхонда
     сё+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: сёхонанда
     сё+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: сёходанда
     сё+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: сёвнанда
     сё+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: сёхоюда
     сё+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: сёхоюда
     сё+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: сёхоюта
     сё+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: [сёёда, сёеда]
     сё+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: [сёёда, сёеда]
     сё+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: [сёёта, сёета]
     сё+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: сёхота
     сё+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: сёхоˮната
     сё+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: сёхотата
     сё+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: [сёёˮманата, сёеˮманата]
     сё+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: сёмиʼ
#     сё+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1.2: сёми
     сё+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: сёмиʼ
#     сё+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1.2: сёми
     сё+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: сёниʼ
#     сё+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1.2: сёни
     сё+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: сёхониʼ
#     сё+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1.2: сёхони
     сё+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: сёхонаниʼ
#     сё+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1.2: сёхонани
     сё+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: сёходаниʼ
#     сё+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1.2: сёходани
     сё+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: сёвнаниʼ
#     сё+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1.2: сёвнани
     сё+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: сёхоюниʼ
#     сё+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1.2: сёхоюни
     сё+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: сёхоюниʼ
#     сё+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1.2: сёхоюни
     сё+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: сёхоюниʼ
#     сё+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1.2: сёхоюни
     сё+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: [сёёниʼ, сёениʼ]
#     сё+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1.2: [сёёни, сёени]
     сё+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: [сёёниʼ, сёениʼ]
#     сё+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1.2: [сёёни, сёени]
     сё+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: [сёёˮниʼ, сёеˮниʼ]
#     сё+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1.2: [сёёˮни, сёеˮни]
     сё+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: сёхоˮниʼ
#     сё+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1.2: сёхоˮни
     сё+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: сёхоˮнаниʼ
#     сё+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1.2: сёхоˮнани
     сё+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: сёхотаниʼ
#     сё+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1.2: сёхотани
     сё+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: [сёёˮмананиʼ, сёеˮмананиʼ]
#     сё+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1.2: [сёёˮманани, сёеˮманани]
     сё+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: сёриʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: сёмдиʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: сёндиʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: сёхондиʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: сёхонандиʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: сёходандиʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: сёвнандиʼ
     сё+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: сёхоюдиʼ
     сё+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: сёхоюдиʼ
     сё+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: сёхоютиʼ
     сё+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: [сёёдиʼ, сёедиʼ]
     сё+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: [сёёдиʼ, сёедиʼ]
     сё+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: [сёётиʼ, сёетиʼ]
     сё+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: сёхотиʼ
     сё+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: сёхоˮнатиʼ
     сё+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: сёхотатиʼ
     сё+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: [сёёˮманатиʼ, сёеˮманатиʼ]
     сё+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: сёдиʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: сёмдиʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: сёндиʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: сёхондиʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: сёхонандиʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: сёходандиʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: сёвнандиʼ
     сё+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: сёхоюдиʼ
     сё+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: сёхоюдиʼ
     сё+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: сёхоютиʼ
     сё+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: [сёёдиʼ, сёедиʼ]
     сё+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: [сёёдиʼ, сёедиʼ]
     сё+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: [сёётиʼ, сёетиʼ]
     сё+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: сёхотиʼ
     сё+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: сёхоˮнатиʼ
     сё+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: сёхотатиʼ
     сё+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: [сёёˮманатиʼ, сёеˮманатиʼ]
     сё+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: сёваˮ
     сё+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: сёваˮ
     сё+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: сёнаˮ
     сё+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: сёхонаˮ
     сё+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: сёхонанаˮ
     сё+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: сёходанаˮ
     сё+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: сёвнанаˮ
     сё+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: сёхоюнаˮ
     сё+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: сёхоюнаˮ
     сё+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: сёхоюнаˮ
     сё+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: [сёёнаˮ, сёенаˮ]
     сё+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: [сёёнаˮ, сёенаˮ]
     сё+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: [сёёˮнаˮ, сёеˮнаˮ]
     сё+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: сёхоˮнаˮ
     сё+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: сёхоˮнанаˮ
     сё+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: сёхотанаˮ
     сё+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: [сёёˮмананаˮ, сёеˮмананаˮ]
     сё+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: сёраˮ
     сё+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: сёмдаˮ
     сё+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: сёндаˮ
     сё+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: сёхондаˮ
     сё+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: сёхонандаˮ
     сё+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: сёходандаˮ
     сё+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: сёвнандаˮ
     сё+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: сёхоюдаˮ
     сё+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: сёхоюдаˮ
     сё+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: сёхоютаˮ
     сё+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: [сёёдаˮ, сёедаˮ]
     сё+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: [сёёдаˮ, сёедаˮ]
     сё+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: [сёётаˮ, сёетаˮ]
     сё+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: сёхотаˮ
     сё+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: сёхоˮнатаˮ
     сё+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: сёхотатаˮ
     сё+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: [сёёˮманатаˮ, сёеˮманатаˮ]
     сё+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: сёдоʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: сёмдоʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: сёндоʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: сёхондоʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: сёхонандоʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: сёходандоʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: сёвнандоʼ
     сё+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: сёхоюдоʼ
     сё+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: сёхоюдоʼ
     сё+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: сёхоютоʼ
     сё+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: [сёёдоʼ, сёедоʼ]
     сё+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: [сёёдоʼ, сёедоʼ]
     сё+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: [сёётоʼ, сёетоʼ]
     сё+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: сёхотоʼ
     сё+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: сёхоˮнатоʼ
     сё+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: сёхотатоʼ
     сё+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: [сёёˮманатоʼ, сёеˮманатоʼ]
     сё+N+Pred+Abs: сёд
     сё+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [сёдав, сёдув, сёдами, сёдми]
     сё+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [сёдав, сёдув, сёдами, сёдми]
     сё+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: [сёдан, сёдани, сёдни]
     сё+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: сёдар
     сё+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: сёдамд
     сё+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: сёданд
     сё+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: [сёдада, сёдда]
     сё+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: сёдамда
     сё+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: сёданда
     сё+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: [сёдамиʼ, сёдмиʼ]
#     сё+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1.2: [сёдами, сёдми]
     сё+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: [сёдамиʼ, сёдмиʼ]
#     сё+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1.2: [сёдами, сёдми]
     сё+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: [сёданиʼ, сёдниʼ]
#     сё+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1.2: [сёдани, сёдни]
     сё+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: [сёдариʼ, сёдриʼ]
     сё+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: сёдамдиʼ
     сё+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: сёдандиʼ
     сё+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: [сёдадиʼ, сёддиʼ]
     сё+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: сёдамдиʼ
     сё+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: сёдандиʼ
     сё+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: [сёдаваˮ, сёдваˮ]
     сё+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: [сёдаваˮ, сёдваˮ]
     сё+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: [сёданаˮ, сёднаˮ]
     сё+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: [сёдараˮ, сёдраˮ]
     сё+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: сёдамдаˮ
     сё+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: сёдандаˮ
     сё+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: [сёдадоʼ, сёддоʼ]
     сё+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: сёдамдоʼ
     сё+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: сёдандоʼ
     сё+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: сёдмʼ
     сё+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: сён
     сё+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: сё
     сё+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: сёниʼ
     сё+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: сёдиʼ
     сё+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: сёхоʼ
     сё+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: сёваˮ
     сё+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: сёдаˮ
     сё+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: сёˮ
     сё+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: сёдамзь
     сё+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: сёнась
     сё+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: сёсь
     сё+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: сёнинзь
     сё+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: сёдинзь
     сё+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: сёхонзь
     сё+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: сёваць
     сё+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: сёдаць
     сё+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: сёць
     сё+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: сёв
     сё+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: сёр
     сё+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: сёда
     сё+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: сёмиʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: сёриʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: сёдиʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: сёваˮ
     сё+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: сёраˮ
     сё+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: сёдоʼ
     сё+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: сёвась
     сё+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: сёрась
     сё+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: сёдась
     сё+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: сёминзь
     сё+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: сёринзь
     сё+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: сёдинзь
     сё+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: сёваць
     сё+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: сёраць
     сё+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: сёдонзь
     сё+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: сёхоюн
     сё+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: сёхоюд
     сё+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: сёхоюда
     сё+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: сёхоюниʼ
     сё+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: сёхоюдиʼ
     сё+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: сёхоюдиʼ
     сё+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: сёхоюнаˮ
     сё+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: сёхоюдаˮ
     сё+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: сёхоюдоʼ
     сё+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: сёхоюнась
     сё+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: сёхоюдась
     сё+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: сёхоюдась
     сё+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: сёхоюнинзь
     сё+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: сёхоюдинзь
     сё+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: сёхоюдинзь
     сё+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: сёхоюнаць
     сё+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: сёхоюдаць
     сё+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: сёхоюдонзь
     сё+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: [сёён, сёен]
     сё+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: [сёёд, сёед]
     сё+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: [сёёда, сёеда]
     сё+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: [сёёниʼ, сёениʼ]
     сё+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: [сёёдиʼ, сёедиʼ]
     сё+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: [сёёдиʼ, сёедиʼ]
     сё+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: [сёёнаˮ, сёенаˮ]
     сё+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: [сёёдаˮ, сёедаˮ]
     сё+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: [сёёдоʼ, сёедоʼ]
     сё+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: [сёёнась, сёенась]
     сё+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: [сёёдась, сёедась]
     сё+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: [сёёдась, сёедась]
     сё+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: [сёёнинзь, сёенинзь]
     сё+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: [сёёдинзь, сёединзь]
     сё+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: [сёёдинзь, сёединзь]
     сё+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: [сёёнаць, сёенаць]
     сё+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: [сёёдаць, сёедаць]
     сё+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: [сёёдонзь, сёедонзь]
     сё+N+Tra: сёӈэ
     сё+N+Car: сёсиˮ
     сё+N+Equ: сёдремʼ
     сё+N+Equ+Lat: сёдревʼ
